Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.330

Motorcycle.

"Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle designed to travel on not more than three wheels, not including any stabilizing conversion kits, on which the driver:

(1) Rides on a seat or saddle and the motor vehicle is designed to be steered with a handlebar; or

(2) Rides on a seat in a partially or completely enclosed seating area that is equipped with safety belts and the motor vehicle is designed to be steered with a steering wheel.

"Motorcycle" excludes a farm tractor, a power wheelchair, an electric personal assistive mobility device, a motorized foot scooter, an electric-assisted bicycle, and a moped.

[ 2013 c 174 s 1; 2009 c 275 s 2; 2003 c 141 s 3; 2002 c 247 s 3; 1990 c 250 s 20; 1979 ex.s. c 213 s 2; 1961 c 12 s 46.04.330. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 34; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part; 1923 c 181 s 1, part; 1921 c 96 s 2, part; 1919 c 59 s 1, part; 1917 c 155 s 1, part; 1915 c 142 s 2, part; RRS s 6313, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part; 1929 c 180 s 1, part; 1927 c 309 s 2, part; RRS s 6362-2, part.]

NOTES:

Legislative review—2002 c 247: See note following RCW 46.04.1695.